Georgia statutes. 
(a) A municipality or county may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property in an urban redevelopment area or any interest therein acquired by it and may enter into contracts with respect thereto, for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use; or the municipality or county may retain such property or interest for public use, in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions, including covenants running with the land and including the incorporation by reference therein of the provisions of an urban redevelopment plan or any part thereof, as it may deem to be in the public interest or necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or spread of future pockets of blight or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter. Such sale, lease, other transfer, or retention and any agreement relating thereto may be made only after the approval of the urban redevelopment plan by the local governing body. The purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns shall be obligated to devote such real property only to the uses specified in the urban redevelopment plan and may be obligated to comply with such other requirements as the municipality or county may determine to be in the public interest, including the obligation to begin within a reasonable time any improvements on the real property required by the urban redevelopment plan. Such real property or interest shall be sold, leased, otherwise transferred, or retained at not less than its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan. In determining the fair value of real property for uses in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan, a municipality or county shall take into account and give consideration to the uses provided in such plan; the restrictions upon and the covenants, conditions, and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee or by the municipality or county retaining the property; and the objectives of such plan for the prevention of the recurrence of pockets of blight. The municipality or county in any instrument of conveyance to a private purchaser or lessee may provide that such purchaser or lessee shall be without power to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer the real property without the prior written consent of the municipality or county until he or she has completed the construction of any and all improvements which he or she has obligated himself or herself to construct thereon. Real property acquired by a municipality or county which, in accordance with the provisions of the urban redevelopment plan, is to be transferred shall be transferred as rapidly as feasible in the public interest consistent with the carrying out of the provisions of the urban redevelopment plan. The inclusion in any such contract or conveyance to a purchaser or lessee of any such covenants, restrictions, or conditions, including the incorporation by reference therein of the provisions of an urban redevelopment plan or any part thereof, shall not prevent the filing of the contract or conveyance in the land records of the county in such manner as to afford actual or constructive notice thereof.

(b) (1) A municipality or county may dispose of real property in an urban redevelopment area to private persons only under such reasonable competitive bidding procedures as it shall prescribe, as are provided in this subsection or, solely with respect to and for the benefit of advancing surface transportation projects, as provided in Code Section 36-61-4. A municipality or county, by public notice by publication once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the community, prior to the execution of any contract to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property and prior to the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under this Code section, may invite proposals from and make available all pertinent information to private redevelopers or any persons interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban redevelopment area or any part thereof. The notice shall identify the area or portion thereof and shall state that such further information as is available may be obtained at such office as shall be designated in the notice. The municipality or county shall consider all such redevelopment or rehabilitation proposals and the financial and legal ability of the persons making such proposals to carry them out and may negotiate with any persons for proposals for the purchase, lease, or other transfer of any real property acquired by the municipality or county in the urban redevelopment area. The municipality or county may accept such proposal as it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. The municipality or county may execute contracts in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section and deliver deeds, leases, and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate such contracts.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions or requirements of this Code section, any municipality or county may exchange real property or land, whether vacant or improved, in any urban redevelopment area for real property or land, whether vacant or improved, owned by any post, barracks, encampment, chapter, subsidiary, or any other division or unit of any veterans' organization chartered by the United States Congress, provided such real property or land was owned by the veterans' organization on March 6, 1962, and, provided, further, that the municipality or county owning such urban redevelopment area desires to obtain the real property or land owned by the veterans' organization for civic improvements, including, but not limited to, the building of art theaters, stadiums, parks, playgrounds, auditoriums, civic theaters, and performing arts theaters.

(c) A municipality or county may temporarily operate and maintain real property acquired in an urban redevelopment area, pending the disposition of the property for redevelopment, without regard to subsection (a) of this Code section, for such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable, even if such uses and purposes are not in conformity with the urban redevelopment plan.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 9; Ga. L. 1962, p. 702, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 7/HB 174; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 5/SB 4.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Factors other than price are to be considered in evaluating bids. Bidders to property under the classification of urban redevelopment projects must be charged with knowledge and held to be on notice of such additional criteria. Dyson v. Dixon, 219 Ga. 427, 134 S.E.2d 1 (1963).

Housing Authority could sell acquired property to private party. - Georgia's Urban Redevelopment Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-61-1 et seq., authorized a housing authority to exercise eminent domain to acquire and redevelop urban property found to be a "slum area;" the housing authority's disposition of condemned property was authorized, and the housing authority was entitled to summary judgment on a former owner's claim that property had been acquired and then sold to a private party. Talley v. Housing Auth., 279 Ga. App. 94, 630 S.E.2d 550 (2006).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Repair or disposal of dwellings outside redevelopment area. - Municipality may acquire, rehabilitate, and dispose of substandard residential dwellings to the housing authority when such dwellings are outside an officially declared urban redevelopment area, if such activities are designed to provide low-rent housing to persons displaced by activities within such area. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U82-28.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 58 et seq. 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 873 et seq.

ALR. - Sufficiency of compliance with condition of sale or lease by municipality of public utility plants, 52 A.L.R. 1052.

Application of Kelo v. City of New London, 545 U.S. 469, 125 S. Ct. 2655, 162 L. Ed. 2d 439 (2005), to "Public Use" restrictions in federal and state constitutions takings clauses and eminent domain statutes, 21 A.L.R.6th 261.

36-61-11. Repair, closing, and demolition of dwellings unfit for human habitation.

Statute text

Any municipality or county may, by ordinance, require the repair, closing, or demolition of dwellings or other structures intended for human habitation which are, as defined in the ordinance, unfit for human habitation or which may imperil the health, safety, or morals of the occupants thereof or of surrounding areas. Such ordinances may include the following:

(1) Definition of the construction, condition, facilities, ventilation, and other conditions which shall render such structures unfit for human habitation or a nuisance;

(2) Designation of a public official or officials with authority to enforce such ordinances and establishment of procedures therefor;

(3) Provision for the enforcement of such ordinances by the municipal court of the municipality, as defined in Code Section 41-2-5, which may include provision for the abatement thereof as nuisances, as provided in such Code section; and

(4) Provision for the posting of notices on dwellings and other structures intended for human habitation, indicating the actions taken by enforcement officials or the court with respect thereto, and the fixing of penalties for the defacing, destruction, or removal of such notices; provided, however, that no such notice shall be posted on any property then designated by proper governmental authority for acquisition by eminent domain.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 18; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1052, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Eminent domain, T. 22.

Condemnation procedure, T. 22, C. 2.

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia real property law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 219 (1981).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Ordinance unconstitutional if effect is to take property by denying right to rebuild. - When the effect of an ordinance passed pursuant to this section and the application thereof is to take from a property owner the owner's property, not through eminent domain, but by denying the owner a right to rebuild under a zoning code and requiring the owner to demolish under a slum clearance code, the ordinance is unconstitutional, null, and void. Shaffer v. City of Atlanta, 223 Ga. 249, 154 S.E.2d 241 (1967).

Any ordinance which authorizes demolition of a structure within the city without compensation to the owner merely because the cost of repair exceeds the value of the structure or any percentage thereof, without first allowing opportunity to repair (and, if necessary, providing for discovery of the criteria which must be met to bring the structure up to a minimum standard) is unconstitutional and void. Horne v. City of Cordele, 140 Ga. App. 127, 230 S.E.2d 333 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 52, 53.

ALR. - What constitutes "Blighted Area" within urban renewal and redevelopment statutes, 45 A.L.R.3d 1096.

36-61-12. Issuance of bonds; payment; tax exemption; form; terms; signatures; negotiability; effect of recitation on bonds.

Statute text

(a) A municipality or county shall have power to issue bonds, in its discretion, from time to time, to finance the undertaking of any urban redevelopment project under this chapter, including, without limiting the generality thereof, the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for surveys and plans for urban redevelopment projects and shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the payment of retirement of such bonds previously issued by it. Such bonds shall be made payable, as to both principal and interest, solely from the income, proceeds, revenues, and funds of the municipality or county derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and carrying out of urban redevelopment projects under this chapter; provided, however, that payment of such bonds, both as to principal and interest, may be further secured by a pledge of any loan, grant, or contribution from the federal government or other source, in aid of any urban redevelopment projects of the municipality or county under this chapter, and by a mortgage of any such urban redevelopment projects or any part thereof, title to which is in the municipality, county, or redevelopment agency.

(b) Bonds issued under this Code section shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction and shall not be subject to the provisions of any other law or charter relating to the authorization, issuance, or sale of bonds. Bonds issued under this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempted from all taxes.

(c) Bonds issued under this Code section shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the local governing body. They may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium), be secured in such manner, and have such other characteristics as may be provided by the resolution of the local governing body or by the trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

(d) All revenue bonds, but not notes or other obligations, issued under this Code section shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with the procedure set forth in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title. The provisions of any resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of bonds under this Code section shall be a contract with every holder of such bonds and enforceable by any bondholder by mandamus or other appropriate action or proceeding at law or in equity.

(e) If any of the public officials of the municipality or county whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons issued under this chapter cease to be such officials before the delivery of the bonds, such signatures, nevertheless, shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the officials had remained in office until the delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

(f) In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this chapter or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the municipality or county in connection with an urban redevelopment project, as defined in paragraph (25) of Code Section 36-61-2, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with this chapter.

(g) Any urban redevelopment agency or housing authority which a municipality or county has elected to exercise powers under Code Section 36-61-17 may also issue bonds, as provided in this Code section, in the same manner as a municipality or county, except that such bonds shall be authorized and the terms and conditions thereof shall be prescribed by the commissioners of such urban redevelopment agency or housing authority in lieu of the local governing body.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 10; Ga. L. 1970, p. 115, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1352, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 6/SB 4.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Revenue bonds generally, § 36-82-60 et seq.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, "paragraph (25)" was substituted for "paragraph (24)" in the middle of subsection (f).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, § 31.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 58 et seq. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2118 et seq.

ALR. - Assignment and transfer of government bonds, 22 A.L.R. 775.

Provision in statute or ordinance limiting rate of interest per annum as precluding requirement of payment at maximum rate at intervals of less than a year, 29 A.L.R. 1109.

36-61-13. Bonds declared legal investments.

Statute text

All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking or investment business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality or county pursuant to this chapter or by any urban redevelopment agency or housing authority vested with urban redevelopment project powers under Code Section 36-61-17, provided that such bonds and other obligations shall be secured by an agreement between the issuer and the federal government, in which the issuer agrees to borrow from the federal government and the federal government agrees to lend to the issuer, prior to the maturity of the bonds or other obligations, moneys in an amount which (together with any other moneys irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on the bonds or other obligations) will suffice to pay the principal of the bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity thereon, which moneys under the terms of the agreement are required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on the bonds or other obligations at their maturity. Such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this Code section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions, and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. Nothing contained in this Code section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 11.)

36-61-14. Exemption of property from execution, levy, and sale; tax exemption.

Statute text

(a) All property of a municipality or county, including funds owned or held by it for the purposes of this chapter, shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same, nor shall judgment against a municipality or county be a charge or lien upon such property; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given pursuant to this chapter by a municipality or county on its rents, fees, grants, or revenues from urban redevelopment projects.

(b) The property of a municipality, county, or any other public body, acquired or held for the purpose of this chapter, is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such property shall be exempt from all taxes of the municipality, the county, the state, or any political subdivision thereof. Such tax exemption shall terminate when the municipality or county sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of property in an urban redevelopment area to a purchaser or lessee who or which is not a public body.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 12; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 7/SB 4.)

36-61-15. Presumption as to title of purchaser of property from municipality or county.

Statute text

Any instrument executed by a municipality or county and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest in any property under this chapter shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with this chapter insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of such property is concerned.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 14.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Sufficiency of compliance with condition of sale or lease by municipality of public utility plants, 52 A.L.R. 1052.

36-61-16. Assistance by public bodies generally; powers of public bodies; powers of municipalities and counties.

Statute text

(a) For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban redevelopment project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine, may:

(1) Dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges therein to a municipality or county;

(2) Incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such public body in exercising the powers granted in this Code section;

(3) Do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of an urban redevelopment plan;

(4) Lend, grant, or contribute funds to a municipality or county;

(5) Enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with a municipality or county or other public body respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban redevelopment project and other provisions allocating legal responsibility for matters arising under or in connection with transactions entered into pursuant to Code Section 36-61-4; and

(6) Cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, trails, greenspace, playgrounds, recreational, community, education, transit, water, sewer, or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished; furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations; and cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the municipality or county.

If at any time title to or possession of any urban redevelopment project is held by any public body or governmental agency, other than the municipality or county, which is authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of urban redevelopment projects, including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, the provisions of the agreements referred to in this subsection shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency. As used in this subsection, the terms "municipality" and "county" shall also include an urban redevelopment agency or a housing authority vested with all of the urban redevelopment project powers pursuant to Code Section 36-61-17.

(b) Any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this Code section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

(c) For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban redevelopment project of an urban redevelopment agency or a housing authority under this chapter, a municipality or county may, in addition to their other powers and upon such terms, with or without consideration, as they may determine, do and perform any or all of the actions or things which, by subsection (a) of this Code section, a public body is authorized to do or perform, including the furnishing of financial and other assistance.

(d) For the purposes of this Code section or for the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban redevelopment project of a municipality or county, such municipality or county may, in addition to any authority to issue bonds pursuant to Code Section 36-61-12, issue and sell its general obligation bonds. Any bonds issued by a municipality or county pursuant to this Code section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of bonds by such municipality and county for public purposes generally.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 8/SB 4.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 485 et seq.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 58 et seq. 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1142 et seq.

36-61-17. Exercise of redevelopment powers by municipalities and counties; delegation to redevelopment agency or housing authority.

Statute text

(a) A municipality or county may itself exercise its "urban redevelopment project powers," as defined in subsection (b) of this Code section, or may, if the local governing body by resolution determines such action to be in the public interest, elect to have such powers exercised by the urban redevelopment agency created by Code Section 36-61-18 or by a housing authority, if one exists or is subsequently established in the community, or by an existing or subsequently established downtown development authority. In the event that the local governing body makes such determination, the urban redevelopment agency or the housing authority or downtown development authority, as the case may be, shall be vested with all of the "urban redevelopment project powers" of the municipality or county conferred in this chapter, in the same manner as though all such powers were conferred on the agency or authority instead of the municipality or county; and any public body may cooperate with the urban redevelopment agency or housing authority or the downtown development authority to the same extent that it could cooperate with the municipality or county itself if the municipality or county were exercising its urban redevelopment project powers. If the local governing body does not elect to make such determination, the municipality or county in its discretion may exercise its urban redevelopment project powers through a board or commissioner or through such officers of the municipality or county as the local governing body may by resolution determine.

(b) As used in this Code section, the term "urban redevelopment project powers" shall include all of the rights, powers, functions, duties, privileges, immunities, and exemptions granted to a municipality or county under this chapter, except the following:

(1) The power to determine an area to be a pocket of blight and to designate such area as appropriate for an urban redevelopment project;

(2) The power to approve and amend urban redevelopment plans;

(3) The power to establish a general plan for the locality as a whole;

(4) The power to formulate a workable program under Code Section 36-61-6;

(5) The powers, duties, and functions referred to in Code Section 36-61-11;

(6) The power to make the determinations and findings provided for in Code Section 36-61-4, Code Section 36-61-5, and subsection (d) of Code Section 36-61-7;

(7) The power to issue general obligation bonds; and

(8) The power to appropriate funds, to levy taxes and assessments, and to exercise other powers provided for in paragraph (8) of Code Section 36-61-8.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 16; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 15; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 8/HB 174.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, §§ 1 et seq., 16.

36-61-18. Creation of agency; appointment of board of commissioners; compensation, term, and certificate; annual report; removal of commissioners.

Statute text

(a) There is created in each municipality and in each county a public body corporate and politic to be known as the "urban redevelopment agency" of the municipality or county. Such agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers under this Code section until or unless the local governing body has made the finding prescribed in Code Section 36-61-5 and has elected to have the urban redevelopment project powers exercised by an urban redevelopment agency as provided in Code Section 36-61-17.

(b) If the urban redevelopment agency is authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this Code section, the mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, or the board of commissioners or other governing body of the county shall appoint a board of commissioners of the urban redevelopment agency, which shall consist of such number of commissioners, with such terms of office, as shall be determined by the local governing body. If the governing body of a municipality designates members of a downtown development authority as an urban redevelopment agency, the method of appointment, number of commissioners, and terms of office shall be in conformity with the requirements of Code Section 36-42-4.

(c) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality or county and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

(d) The powers of an urban redevelopment agency shall be exercised by the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws require a larger number. Any person may be appointed as commissioner if he resides within the area of operation of the agency, which shall be coterminous with the area of operation of the municipality or county, and is otherwise eligible for such appointments under this chapter.

(e) The mayor or the board of commissioners or other governing body of the county shall designate a chairman and vice-chairman from among the commissioners. An agency may employ an executive director, technical experts, and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require and may determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall file with the local governing body, on or before March 31 of each year, a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year, which report shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the end of such calendar year. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed with the municipality or county and that the report is available for inspection during business hours in the office of the city or county clerk and in the office of the agency.

(f) For inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed, but only after a hearing. He shall be given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to such hearing and shall have an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 16; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 16.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, § 10 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 447, 448, 455, 531 et seq.

36-61-19. Interest by public official or employee or employee of redevelopment agency in redevelopment project or property; disclosure; eligibility of commissioners and officers of housing authorities for other office.

Statute text

(a) No public official or employee of a municipality or county or of a board or commission thereof and no commissioner or employee of a housing authority or urban redevelopment agency which has been vested by a municipality or county with urban redevelopment project powers under Code Section 36-61-17 shall voluntarily acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any urban redevelopment project of such municipality or county or in any property included or planned to be included in any such urban redevelopment project or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with such urban redevelopment project. Where such acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed in writing to the local governing body and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body. If any such official, commissioner, or employee presently owns or controls, or owned or controlled within the preceding two years, any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which he knows is included or planned to be included in an urban redevelopment project, he shall immediately disclose this in writing to the local governing body, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body; any such official, commissioner, or employee shall not participate in any action by the municipality or county or a board or commission thereof, the housing authority, or the urban redevelopment agency affecting such property. Any disclosure required to be made by this Code section to the local governing body shall concurrently be made to a housing authority or urban redevelopment agency which has been vested with urban redevelopment project powers by the municipality or county pursuant to Code Section 36-61-17.

(b) Directors of a downtown development authority designated as an urban redevelopment agency pursuant to this chapter and other public officers of the municipality or county may serve as commissioners of the urban redevelopment agency, provided that such persons comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section.

(c) Any violation of this Code section shall constitute misconduct in office.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 17; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 17; Ga. L. 2010, p. 834, § 1/SB 456.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 248 et seq. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 195, 235, 236, 242 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 429, 430, 433, 434.

——————————

CHAPTER 62

DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES

Sec.

36-62-1. Short title.

36-62-2. Definitions.

36-62-3. Constitutional authority for chapter; finding of public purposes; tax exemption.

36-62-4. Development authorities created; appointment and terms of directors; quorum; adoption and filing of resolution of need.

36-62-5. Directors; officers; compensation; adoption of bylaws; delegation of powers and duties; conflicts of interest; audits.

36-62-5.1. Joint authorities.

36-62-6. Powers of authority generally.

36-62-6.1. Obtaining real property within adjoining county which will be exchanged for federal property.

36-62-7. Operation of project by governmental units prohibited; sale or lease of property for operation.

36-62-8. Obligations of authority; use of proceeds; status as revenue obligations; subsequent series of bonds or notes; bond anticipation notes; interest rates; issuance and validation.

36-62-9. Purposes of chapter; issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes; exceptions.

36-62-10. Obligations of authority not indebtedness of state or political subdivisions.

36-62-11. Construction of chapter generally; effect of conflict between chapter and other provisions of law; applicability of certain other provisions of law to proceedings under chapter.

36-62-12. Previously created authority not affected by chapter.

36-62-13. Disposition of property of certain authorities dissolved by operation of law.

36-62-14. Perpetual existence of authority; dissolution.

Annotations

Cross references. - Housing authorities of counties and municipalities, T. 8, C. 3.

Downtown development authorities, T. 36, C. 42.

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

For note, "Procedural requirements for public approval of tax-exempt industrial development bonds under TEFRA," see 19 Ga. St. B. J. 84 (1982).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Similarity to Downtown Development Authorities Law. - Although the Downtown Development Authorities Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-62-1 et seq., expands the scope of permissible authority projects beyond that of the Development Authorities Law to include all types of commercial projects, the Downtown Development Authorities Law otherwise resembles the Development Authorities Law in design and purpose. Odom v. Union City Downtown Dev. Auth., 251 Ga. 248, 305 S.E.2d 110 (1983).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

For multifaceted discussion of the operation of this chapter, see 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 80-158.

Development authority may not disburse funds to a chamber of commerce for general promotion and other described activities without violating Ga. Const. 1976, Art. III, Sec. VIII, Para. XII (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI). 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-7.

City development authority could transfer assets, including cash and contract rights, to a joint city-county development authority in return for services. 1996 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U96-24.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Adverse impact upon existing business as factor affecting validity and substantive requisites of issuance, by state or local governmental agencies, of economic development bonds in support of private business enterprise, 39 A.L.R.4th 1096.

Eminent domain: industrial park or similar development as public use justifying condemnation of private property, 62 A.L.R.4th 1183.

36-62-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter may be referred to as the "Development Authorities Law."

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article discussing industrial development bond financing under Georgia development authority law, see 14 Ga. St. B. J. 10 (1977). For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Hay v. Newton County, 246 Ga. App. 44, 538 S.E.2d 181 (2000); Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 320 Ga. App. 689, 740 S.E.2d 663 (2013).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1279, 1280.

36-62-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Authority" means each public corporation created pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Cost of project" includes:

(A) All costs of construction, purchase, or other form of acquisition;
